Indiana, session 2026, SB248.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-23-8-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.184-2023,
SECTION 31, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "school
corporation" means a local public school corporation established under
the laws of Indiana. The term does not include a school corporation
covered by IC 20-23-12.1, IC 20-23-17, or IC 20-23-17.2, or
IC 20-23-20.
SECTION 2. IC 20-23-15-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. This chapter does not
apply to the South Bend Community school corporation after June
30, 2026. A member elected to the South Bend Community school
corporation pursuant to this chapter before June 30, 2026, shall
serve as a member of the South Bend Community school
corporation advisory board pursuant to IC 20-23-20-5 until the
member's term expires or until the member's term terminates
under IC 20-23-20-6.
2026 IN 248—LS 6981/DI 152


SECTION 3. IC 20-23-20 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]:
Chapter 20. Appointment of Governing Body Members in South
Bend
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "commission" means the
governing body nominating commission established by section 7 of
this chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "fiscal body" has the meaning set
forth in IC 36-1-2-6.
Sec. 3. IC 20-23-8 does not apply to the South Bend Community
school corporation or the governing body of the South Bend
Community school corporation.
Sec. 4. (a) Beginning July 1, 2026, the governing body of the
South Bend Community school corporation consists of seven (7)
members appointed by the secretary of education from a list of
individuals nominated under section 9 of this chapter.
(b) An individual appointed under this section serves a four (4)
year term.
(c) A member of the governing body serves at the pleasure of the
appointing authority.
(d) A member of the governing body may be reappointed to
successive terms.
Sec. 5. The governing body serving on June 30, 2026, shall
become on July 1, 2026, an advisory board to the governing body
described in section 4 of this chapter. The members of the
governing body serving on June 30, 2026, shall on July 1, 2026,
become the members of the advisory board. Each member shall
serve on the advisory board until the term for which the member
was elected before July 1, 2026, expires or until the term
terminates under section 6 of this chapter. When the terms of all
members of the advisory board have expired, or terminated under
section 6 of this chapter, the advisory board is abolished. The
advisory board shall not possess any of the power and duties of the
governing body. A member of the advisory board may receive
compensation for serving on the advisory board.
Sec. 6. (a) If an individual seeks a nomination for appointment
by the secretary of education to one (1) of the positions of the
governing body described in section 4 of this chapter, the following
apply:
(1) An individual seeking a nomination for appointment by
the secretary of education to the governing body shall submit
2026 IN 248—LS 6981/DI 152


a resume to the commission at a time and in a manner
determined by the commission.
(2) An individual described in this subsection must reside
within the boundaries of St. Joseph County.
(b) A member of the advisory board described in section 5 of
this chapter may seek a nomination for appointment under
subsection (a). However, an advisory board member's term shall
immediately terminate upon seeking a nomination for
appointment.
Sec. 7. (a) There is established a governing body nominating
commission.
(b) The fiscal body shall provide all facilities, equipment,
supplies, and services necessary for the administration of the duties
imposed upon the commission. The members of the commission
shall serve without compensation. However, the fiscal body shall
reimburse members of the commission for their actual expenses
incurred in performing their duties.
Sec. 8. (a) The commission consists of the following nine (9)
members:
(1) One (1) member appointed by the mayor of South Bend,
who resides within the boundaries of the South Bend
Community school corporation.
(2) One (1) member appointed by the St. Joseph County board
of commissioners.
(3) One (1) member appointed by the South Bend Education
Alliance who resides within the boundaries of the South Bend
Community school corporation.
(4) One (1) member appointed by the Community Foundation
of St. Joseph County.
(5) One (1) member of the Ivy Tech Community College state
board of trustees appointed by the Ivy Tech Community
College state board of trustees.
(6) One (1) member appointed by the South Bend Regional
Chamber of Commerce, who resides within the boundaries of
the South Bend Community school corporation.
(7) One (1) member appointed by the South Bend-Elkhart
Regional Partnership, who resides within the boundaries of
the South Bend Community school corporation.
(8) One (1) member appointed by the Home Builders
Association of St. Joseph Valley, who resides within the
boundaries of the South Bend Community school corporation.
(9) One (1) member appointed by the South Bend Area
2026 IN 248—LS 6981/DI 152


Realtors Association, who resides within the boundaries of the
South Bend Community school corporation.
(b) A majority of the members appointed to the commission
constitutes a quorum.
(c) The members of the commission must reside within Indiana.
(d) The individual appointed under subsection (a)(6) shall serve
as the chairperson of the commission.
(e) All appointments to the commission shall be made not later
than April 1, 2026. This subsection expires January 1, 2027.
Sec. 9. The commission shall:
(1) meet at the call of the chairperson to consider the resumes
submitted under section 6 of this chapter;
(2) interview individuals for nomination at the commission's
discretion;
(3) nominate at least ten (10) candidates for consideration for
appointment under section 4 of this chapter; and
(4) submit the names of the individuals nominated under
subdivision (3) to the secretary of education for consideration
for appointment under section 4 of this chapter not later than
June 1, 2026, and before June 1 of each year thereafter in
which the term of an individual described in section 4 of this
chapter expires.
Sec. 10. (a) A vacancy in the office of a member of the governing
body shall be filled as soon as practicable after the vacancy occurs
in the same manner by the appointing authority. The commission
shall nominate at least three (3) individuals per vacancy to the
secretary of education for consideration for appointment. An
individual filling a vacancy under this subsection serves until the
expiration of the term of the member whose position the individual
fills.
(b) A vacancy in the office of a member of the commission shall
be filled in the same manner by the appointing authority that
appointed the member whose office is vacant.
SECTION 4. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 248—LS 6981/DI 152